Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.170

Injunctive relief—Council may seek.

The council may seek injunctive relief, after giving notice to the affected party, in a court of competent jurisdiction for a violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter. The council need not allege or prove that the council has no adequate remedy at law. The right of injunction provided in this section is in addition to any other legal remedy which the council has and is in addition to any right of criminal prosecution provided by law. The existence of council action with respect to alleged violations of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter does not operate as a bar to an action for injunctive relief under this section.

[ 2012 c 229 s 553; 1986 c 136 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.